Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

Conveyances by Deceased Persons

66-4-101. Execution by personal representative of deceased vendor.

In all cases of written agreements or contracts for the conveyance of land in this state, where the person executing the agreement or contract dies before final conveyance is made, the decedent's personal representatives may execute the conveyance to the person with whom such agreement or contract was made, or the decedent's heirs or assigns, according to the forms prescribed for the conveyance of real estate.

Code 1858, § 2025 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 5, § 1); Shan., § 3692; Code 1932, § 7614; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-401.

Cross-References. Forms for conveyance, §66-5-103.

Inventory and management of estates, title 30, ch. 2, part 3.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 614, 731.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 43.

66-4-102. Registration of contract required.

The personal representative cannot be required to execute a conveyance under §66-4-101, unless the written agreement or contract, duly registered, or a certified copy of the agreement or contract from the register's books, is produced and delivered to the representative.

Code 1858, § 2028 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 5, § 1); Shan., § 3695; Code 1932, § 7617; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-402.

Cross-References. Index of public records, title 10, ch. 7, part 2.

Registration of instruments, title 66, ch. 24.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 614, 732.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 43.

66-4-103. Deed by one of several representatives.

If there are several personal representatives, a deed by any of the representatives will be as valid as if executed by all.

Code 1858, § 2027 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 5, § 3); Shan., § 3694; Code 1932, § 7616; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-403.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 614, 733.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executors and Administrators, § 52.

66-4-104. Description of land used in deed.

In case the agreement or contract is for part of a tract of land, not ascertained by metes and bounds, the personal representative shall execute the conveyance according to the description given in the contract.

Code 1858, § 2029 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 5, § 4); Shan., § 3696; Code 1932, § 7618; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-404.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 614, 735.

Law Reviews.

The Common Law “Duty to Serve” and Protection of Consumers in an Age of Competitive Retail Public Utility Restructuring (Jim Rossi), 51 Vand. L. Rev. 1233 (1998).

Collateral References.

Description in deed as relating to magnetic or true meridian. 70 A.L.R.3d 1220.

Description of land conveyed by reference to river or stream as carrying to thread or center or only to bank thereof — modern status. 78 A.L.R.3d 604.

Measure and elements of damages recoverable from vendor where there has been a mistake as to amount of land conveyed. 94 A.L.R.3d 1091.

66-4-105. Execution of contract with personal representative.

If the person with whom such agreement or contract was made is also the personal representative, the court granting administration may appoint a guardian or representative of the heirs, who shall make the conveyance according to the written agreement.

Code 1858, § 2026 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 5, § 2); Shan., § 3693; Code 1932, § 7615; impl. am. Acts 1980, ch. 875, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-405.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 614, 734.